Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1569.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 16-549, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-549. Special election boards; expenses; voting procedure for ill electors or electors with disabilities A. The county recorder or other officer in charge of elections, for the purpose of making it possible for qualified electors who are ill or have a disability to vote, may appoint such number of special election boards as needed. In a partisan election, each such board shall consist of two members, one from each of the two political parties that cast the highest number of votes in the state in the last preceding general election. The county chairman of each such party shall furnish, within sixty days before the election day, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections with a list of names of qualified electors within the chairman's political party, and such additional lists as may be required, from which the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall appoint members to such special election boards. The county recorder or other officer in charge of elections may refuse for cause to appoint or may for cause remove a member of this board. A person who is a candidate for an office other than precinct committeeman is not eligible to serve on the special election board for that election. B. Members of special election boards appointed under this section shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in the manner provided by law and shall also receive such compensation as the board of supervisors or the governing body prescribes, all of which shall be paid by the county or other political subdivision. C. In lieu of the mailed early ballot procedure, any qualified elector who is confined as the result of a continuing illness or physical disability and is, therefore, not able to go to the polls on the day of the next election and who does not wish to vote by the mailed early ballot procedure,  may make a verbal or a signed written request to the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections to have a ballot personally delivered to the elector by the special election board at the elector's place of confinement within the county or other political subdivision. The ballot shall be delivered to the elector in person by a special election board as provided in this section. Such requests must be made by 5:00 p.m. on the second Friday before the election. D. Qualified electors who become ill or become a person with a disability after the second Friday before the election may nevertheless request personal ballot delivery pursuant to this section, and the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall when possible honor such requests up to and including the last day before the election. Qualified electors who are admitted to a hospital after 5:00 p.m. on the second Friday preceding the election and before 5:00 p.m. on election day may request the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections to provide a special election board with a ballot at the elector's place of confinement. If the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections is able to accommodate the request, the voted ballot of the elector shall be sealed in an envelope and shall be processed as a provisional ballot pursuant to section 16-584. Before receiving a ballot pursuant to this subsection, a qualified elector shall provide identification as prescribed in section 16-579 and shall sign a statement under penalty of perjury that states that the person is experiencing or experienced an emergency after 5:00 p.m. on the second Friday preceding the election and before 5:00 p.m. on the Monday immediately preceding the election that would prevent the person from voting at the polls. Signed statements received pursuant to this subsection are not subject to inspection pursuant to title 39, chapter 1, article 2. E. The manner and procedure of voting shall be as provided in section 16-548, except that the marked ballot in the sealed envelope shall be handed by the elector to the special election board and shall be delivered by the board to the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections. F. In order to ensure that a qualified elector's voter registration information is correct and that the qualified elector RECEIVES the correct ballot, A special election board member may update any necessary voter registration INFORMATION for the QUALIFIED electors that the special election board is assigned to assist. A special election board member shall not collect, process or otherwise facilitate a new voter registration or change an existing voter registration for any other person at that facility or location while acting for or on behalf of the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections. END_STATUTE